Mississippi, session 2026, SB2745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Sections 1 through 3 of this act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Freedom Boater Law." SECTION 2. (1)  No enforcement officer or any agent of the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks or the Department of Marine Resources shall perform a vessel stop or board a vessel for the sole purpose of performing a safety inspection under this chapter or the rules and regulations of the commission.  A violation based on the safety equipment carriage and use requirements of this chapter or any rules or regulations promulgated addressing the same is a secondary offense, rather than a primary offense. (2)  No enforcement officer or any agent of the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks or the Department of Marine Resources shall board any vessel or perform a vessel stop in this state unless the officer or agent has probable cause to believe that a violation of this chapter that constitutes a primary offense or any other criminal offense under the Mississippi Code of 1972 has occurred or is occurring. SECTION 3. (1)  (a)  The commission, in conjunction with the Office of Driver Service Bureau of the Department of Public Safety, shall create a "Mississippi Freedom Boater" safety inspection decal for issue at time of registration or renewal, signifying that the vessel is deemed to have met the safety equipment carriage and use requirements of this chapter.  Upon demonstrated compliance with the safety equipment carriage and use requirements of this chapter at the time of registration or renewal, the operator of a vessel shall be issued a "Mississippi Freedom Boater" safety inspection decal. The Department of Marine Resources may designate by rule the timeframe for expiration of, and the specific design for, the "Mississippi Freedom Boater" safety inspection decal.  However, a decal may not be valid for less than one (1) calendar year or more than five (5) years at the time of issue and, at a minimum, must meet the standards specified in this subsection. (b)  The "Mississippi Freedom Boater" safety inspection decal must be located within six (6) inches of the inspected vessel's properly displayed vessel registration decal. For nonmotorized vessels that are not required to be registered, the "Mississippi Freedom Boater" safety inspection decal must be located above the waterline on the forward half of the port side of the vessel. (2)  This section does not restrict a law enforcement officer from stopping a vessel for any other lawful purpose when the officer has probable cause to believe that a violation of this chapter that constitutes a primary offense or any other criminal offense under the Mississippi Code of 1972 has occurred or is occurring. SECTION 4.  Section 59-21-127, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 59-21-127.  (1)  Subject to the provisions of Section 1 of this act, it shall be the duty of all enforcement officers to enforce, and to obey and carry out all instructions, directions, rules and regulations of the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks with respect to the enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.  Each enforcement officer shall account for and pay over, pursuant to law, all monies received by him or her under this chapter. (2)  Subject to the provisions of Section 1 of this act, such enforcement officers shall have the power, and it shall be their duty * * *,: (a)  To execute all warrants for violations of the rules and regulations of the commission and the provisions of this chapter that constitute a primary offense; (b)  To serve subpoenas issued for the examination and investigation or trial of such violations; (c)  To board and examine, without warrant but only upon probable cause, any vessel required to be numbered under this chapter, to ascertain whether any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the commission that constitute a primary offense or any criminal offense under the Mississippi Code of 1972 has been or is being violated, and to use such force as may be necessary for the purpose of such examination and inspection; (d)  To arrest, without warrant but only upon probable cause, any person committing a violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations of the commission that constitute a primary offense or any criminal offense under the Mississippi Code of 1972 in the presence of the enforcement officers, and to take such person before a magistrate or court having jurisdiction for trial or hearing; and (e)  To exercise such other powers of peace officers in the enforcement of this chapter and the rules and regulations of the commission or of a judgment for the violation thereof, as are not herein specifically provided. (3)  No enforcement officers shall compromise or settle out of court any violation of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated by the commission. SECTION 5.  Sections 1 through 3 of this act shall be codified within Chapter 21, Title 59, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 6.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.